ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > 壁パネル: ビードボード; ボード・バッテンパネル; プランク; 腰板パネル
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Панели для стен: Рифленые панели; Панели из досок и реек; Доски; Панели вайнскот
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Стенна ламперия: Вертикална ламперия; Ламперия от дъски и летви; Дървена ламперия; Дъбови панели за ламперия
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Seinäpaneelit: Alaseinäpaneelit; Pystykuvioidut paneelit; Lankut; Vaakakuvioidut paneelit
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Lambrisering: Beadboards; Lambrisering van planken en latten; Lambriseringsplanken; Overige lambrisering
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Painéis de parede: Painéis náutico; Painéis de placa e sarrafo; Pranchas; Painéis de lambris
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Recubrimiento de paredes: Tableros de cuentas; Paneles de tableros y listones; Tablones; Paneles de revestimiento de madera
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Wandverkleidung: Beadboards; Brett- und Lattenverkleidung; Bretter; Vertäfelung
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > แผ่นประดับผนัง: ผนังกรุ; แผ่นผนังและระแนง; ไม้กระดาน; แผ่นไม้บุผนัง
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Sienų apdailos plokštės: Apdailos plokštės su grioveliais; Apdailos plokštės iš lentų su gulekšniu; Lentos; Drožtinųjų tašų apdailos plokštės
en: Hardware > Building Materials > Wall Paneling: Beadboards; Board & Batten Paneling; Planks; Wainscoting Paneling
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Panele ścienne: Panele klasyczne; Panele deskowe i listwowe; Deski; Boazeria
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Väggpaneler: Pärlspånt; Bräd- och läktpanel; Plankor; Skyddslistspanel
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Veggpaneler: Veggplater; Bord- og lektepaneler; Planker; Profilerte paneler
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Falburkolat: Gyöngydeszkák; Deszka- és léces burkolat; Deszkák; Lakásburkolat
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 墙板: 珠饰板; 板材和板条镶板; 木板; 护墙板
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Stěnové panely: Lamelové panely; Anglické dřevěné obklady; Palubky; Dekorační obklady
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Επένδυση τοίχου: Πάνελ τύπου Beadboards; Πάνελ με σανίδες Board & Batten; Σανίδες; Επένδυση Wainscoting
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Vægpaneler: Perleplader; Brædde- og lægtepaneler; Planker; Wainscoting-paneler
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Zidne obloge: Letvičaste zidne obloge; Obloge od ploča i letvica; Daske; Panel obloge
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Duvar Kaplamaları: Boncuk Tahtaları; Tahta ve Çıta Lambri; Kalaslar; Lambri Kaplama
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Lambriuri de perete: Panouri verticale; Panouri din scânduri și șipci; Scânduri; Panouri pentru lambrisare
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 벽 판자: 비드 보드; 보드앤배튼 패널; 목재판; 웨인스코팅 패널
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Lambris: Lambris bas; Lambris à planches et à lattes; Planches; Lambris mural
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Obloženie stien: Nástenné panely; Panely a lišty; Dosky; Anglické obloženie
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Painéis de janelas: Painéis de miçangas; Painéis de tábuas e ripas; Pranchas; Painéis de lambris
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 牆板: 鑲板; 扣板牆板; 木板; 護牆板
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Stenske plošče: Obloge iz lesenih letvic; Obloge iz desk in letvic; Deske; Zaščitne obloge za stene
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Pannelli: Beadboard; Pannellatura di tavole e listelli; Tavole; Boiserie
vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Tấm ốp tường: Ván cườm; Ván lát; Ván; Tấm ván ốp chân tường